Maryland, session 2026, HB1579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
2–309.
(a) This section applies to all units in the Executive Branch of State government,
including units with independent personnel systems.
(b) A unit subject to this section may not limit, to less than 60 days, the aggregate
number of days of accrued sick leave that two employees who are responsible for the care
and nurturing of a child may use, without certification of illness or disability, to care for
the child during the period immediately following:
(1) the birth of the employees’ child; or
(2) the placement of the child with the employees for adoption.
(c) In implementing the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, a unit
subject to this section may not limit, to less than 24 weeks, the aggregate number of weeks
of family and medical leave that two employees [who are married to one another] may use
during a 12–month period for:
(1) the birth of the employees’ child;
(2) the placement of a child with the employees for adoption or foster care;
(3) the serious health condition of the employees’ child, if the child is a
minor; or
(4) the care of the employees’ adult child, if the adult child is incapable of
self–care.
9–501.
(a) Each employee in the State Personnel Management System, except a
temporary employee, is entitled to sick leave with pay as provided in this subtitle.
9–505.
(a) An employee who is responsible for the care and nurturing of a child may use,
without certification of illness or disability, up to 30 days of accrued sick leave OR PAID
FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE UNDER SUBTITLE 10 OF THIS TITLE to care for the child
during the period immediately following:
(1) the birth of the employee’s child; or

HOUSE BILL 1579 3
(2) the placement of the child with the employee for adoption.
(b) If two employees TOGETHER are responsible for the care and nurturing of a
child, each employee may use, without certification of illness or disability, up to 30 days of
accrued sick leave OR PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE UNDER SUBTITLE 10 OF THIS
TITLE to care for the child during the period immediately following:
(1) the birth of the employees’ child; or
(2) the placement of the child with the employees for adoption.
(c) (1) An employee who uses accrued sick leave following the birth of the
employee’s child may not receive payment under this subtitle unless the employee gives the
employee’s immediate supervisor information required by guidelines issued by the
Secretary about the Family Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.
(2) An employee who uses accrued sick leave for adoption purposes may
not receive payment under this subtitle unless the employee gives the employee’s
immediate supervisor the certificate required by guidelines issued by the Secretary about
the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.
(D) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE AMOUNT
OF LEAVE AN EMPLOYEE IS ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE UNDER SUBTITLE 10 OF THIS
TITLE.
9–1006.
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the Secretary shall adopt regulations,
guidelines, or policies implementing the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993.
(b) The regulations adopted by the Secretary:
(1) may require an eligible employee to use other available [accrued] leave
concurrently with family and medical leave; and
(2) may not limit, to less than 24 weeks, the aggregate number of weeks of
family and medical leave that two employees who are [married to one another]
RESPONSIBLE FOR THE CARE AND NURTURING OF A CHILD may use during a
12–month period for:
(i) the birth of the employees’ child;
(ii) the placement of a child with the employees for adoption or foster
care;

HOUSE BILL 1579
(iii) the serious health condition of the employees’ child, if the child
is a minor; or
(iv) the care of the employees’ adult child, if the adult child is
incapable of self–care.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, the effective date of Chapter 606 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025. If
the effective date of Chapter 606 is amended, this Act shall take effect on the taking effect
of Chapter 606.